New Jersey, session 221, S1710.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Health, in consultation with local health agencies, shall establish a uniform standard for health and sanitary evaluation placards that represent a health inspectors evaluation of the health and sanitary conditions of a retail food establishment and are posted by that establishment in a conspicuous place for view by the public. The uniform standard shall include a three-tier, color-coded evaluation placard system indicating satisfactory, conditionally satisfactory, or unsatisfactory compliance by a retail food establishment subject to the State Sanitary Code, established pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1947, c.177 (C.26:1A-7), and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. b.    This act shall supersede any municipal ordinance or regulation concerning health and sanitary evaluation placards posted in retail food establishments. 2.    The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Health  may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.